Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 7. Enhanced Public Safety Telephone Services Act.

§ 56-484.12.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Automatic location identification” or

“ALI”
means a telecommunications network capability that enables the automatic display of information defining the geographical location of the telephone used to place a wireless enhanced 9-1-1 call.

“Automatic number identification” or

“ANI”
means a telecommunications network capability that enables the automatic display of the telephone number used to place a wireless Enhanced 9-1-1 call.

“Board” means the 9-1-1 Services Board created pursuant to this article.

“Chief Information Officer” or

“CIO”
means the Chief Information Officer appointed pursuant to §

2.2-2005

.

“Coordinator” means the Virginia Public Safety Communications Systems Coordinator employed by the Division.

“CMRS” means mobile telecommunications service as defined in the federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. § 124, as amended.

“CMRS provider” means an entity authorized by the Federal Communications Commission to provide CMRS within the Commonwealth.

“Division” means the Division of Public Safety Communications created in § 44-146.18:5.

“Emergency services IP network” or

“ESInet”
means a shared public safety agency-managed Internet protocol (IP) network that (i) is used for emergency services communications, (ii) provides an IP transport infrastructure that is capable of carrying voice and data and
that supports next generation 9-1-1 service core functions such as routing and location validation of emergency service requests, and (iii) is engineered, managed, and intended to support emergency public safety communications and
9-1-1 service.

“Enhanced 9-1-1 service” or

“E-911”
means a service consisting of telephone network features and PSAPs provided for users of telephone systems enabling such users to reach a PSAP by dialing the digits “9-1-1.” Such service automatically directs 9-1-1 emergency
telephone calls to the appropriate PSAPs by selective routing based on the geographical location from which the emergency call originated and provides the capability for ANI and ALI features.

“ESInet point of interconnection” means the demarcation point at which the NG9-1-1 Service Provider receives and assumes responsibility for 9-1-1 call traffic from originating service providers.

“Local exchange carrier” means any public service company granted a certificate to furnish public utility service for the provision of local exchange telephone service pursuant to Chapter 10.1 (§ 56-265.1 et seq.) of Title 56.

“Next generation 9-1-1 service” or

“NG9-1-1”
means a service that (i) consists of coordinated intrastate 9-1-1 IP networks serving residents of the Commonwealth with the routing of emergency service requests, by voice or data, across public safety ESInets; (ii) automatically
directs 9-1-1 emergency telephone calls and other emergency service requests in data formats to the appropriate PSAPs by routing using geographical information system data; (iii) provides for ANI and ALI features; and (iv) interconnects
with enhanced 9-1-1 service.

“9-1-1 service” includes E-911 and NG9-1-1.

“Originating service provider” means the local exchange carrier, VoIP provider, or CMRS provider that serves the end user over which a 9-1-1 call, 9-8-8 call, call to the crisis call center, as defined in §

37.2-311.1

, or call to the NSPL, as defined in §

37.2-311.1

, is made.

“Place of primary use” has the meaning as defined in the federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. § 124, as amended.

“Postpaid CMRS” means CMRS that is not prepaid CMRS, as defined in § 56-484.17:1.

“Public safety answering point” or

“PSAP”
means a facility (i) equipped and staffed on a 24-hour basis to receive and process 9-1-1 calls or (ii) that intends to receive and process 9-1-1 calls and has notified CMRS providers in its jurisdiction of its intention
to receive and process such calls.

“VoIP service” means interconnected voice over Internet protocol service as defined in the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 47, Part 9, section 9.3, as amended.

“Wireless E-911 Fund” means the fund created pursuant to § 56-484.17.

“Wireless E-911 surcharge” means a fee billed with respect to postpaid CMRS customers by each CMRS provider and CMRS reseller on each CMRS device capable of two-way interactive voice communication.

History.
2000, c. 1064; 2001, c. 529; 2002, c. 68; 2003, cc. 160, 341, 981, 1021; 2005, c. 942; 2006, cc. 739, 780; 2010, cc. 466, 566; 2011, cc. 120, 138; 2016, c. 361; 2018, cc. 532, 533; 2020, c. 423; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 248.

Cross references.

As to exclusions under Virginia Freedom of Information Act for records relating to public safety and trade secrets, see §§

2.2-3705.2

and

2.2-3705.6

.

As to the limited purposes for which “public bodies,” as defined by the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, may hold closed meetings, see §

2.2-3711

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 68, cl. 2, provides: “That if a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on the merits that is based on federal law, is no longer subject to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements of the Mobile
Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. § 116 et seq., as amended, adopted by this act, then all amendments enacted by this act are declared to be invalid and have no legal effect as of the date of entry of such judgment. Further,
as of the date of entry of such judgment, all amendments enacted by this act shall automatically be repealed and the law in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this act, as it pertained to the sourcing of local mobile
telecommunications services, shall be effective.”

Acts 2002, c. 68, cl. 4, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be applicable to customer bills issued after August 1, 2002.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 3, provides: “That the local consumer utility tax imposed on franchised cable services, local telecommunications services, and local mobile telecommunications are repealed, notwithstanding any contrary provision of any local charter,
special act, or general law.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 4, provides: “That all taxes and fees imposed in accordance with the provisions of any Code of Virginia section or any local charter that are repealed or otherwise amended by this act and that remain unpaid as of January 1, 2007,
shall be subject to payment and collection in accordance with any administrative or judicial remedies existing prior or subsequent to this act’s enactment and any bad debt associated with such taxes and fees that occurs after January
1, 2007, shall be offset against revenues collected from the Communications Sales and Use Tax.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 6, provides: “That the provisions of the eighth enactment of this act shall be effective beginning on July 1, 2006, and the remaining provisions of this act, with the exception of §

58.1-656

of the Code of Virginia, shall be effective beginning on January 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 8, provides: “That the Auditor of Public Accounts (APA) shall determine the amount of revenues received by every county, city, and town for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006, at rates adopted on or
before January 1, 2006, for each of the following taxes and fees collected by the service providers: gross receipts tax in excess of 0.5%, local consumer utility tax, video program excise tax, cable franchise fee, and 911 taxes and
fees, where they are collected. Based on each locality’s percentage of the total Fiscal Year 2006 receipts from these sources, the APA shall calculate each locality’s percentage share of future distributions of the Telecommunications
Sales and Use Tax by the Department of Taxation. Local governments and service providers shall cooperate with the APA and provide information to him as requested. Every town with a population of less than 3,500, and any other county,
city, or town whose annual audited financial statement cannot be completed by October 1, 2006, shall provide to the APA by that date a statement of its receipts during Fiscal Year 2006 from such telecommunications and cable sources,
verified in writing by an independent certified public accountant. Any locality that fails to furnish the information required to make this calculation in a timely manner shall not be entitled to participate in the distribution of
such tax, and its percentage share shall be disregarded in calculating the distribution to other localities. The APA or his agent shall not divulge any information acquired by him in the performances of his duties under this section
that may identify specific service providers. The APA shall report his findings on a tax-by-tax basis to the chairmen of the House and Senate Finance Committees and the Department of Taxation no later than December 1, 2006. Further,
the APA shall collect annually from local governments and service providers the necessary data to determine changes in: (i) market area and number of customers served, (ii) types of services available, (iii) population, and (iv) possible
local reimbursement. The APA shall report his findings to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Finance no later than December 1 each year.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9, provides: “That if any of the provisions of this act are declared invalid in a nonappealable court order, then the remaining provisions of this act shall be invalid and the provisions of §§

15.2-2108

, 56-468.1, 56-484.4, 56-484.5, 56-484.6, 56-484.12,

58.1-3812

,

58.1-3813.1

,

58.1-3815

,

58.1-3816.2

, and

58.1-3818.1

through 58.1-3818.7 of the Code of Virginia and the third enactment clause of Chapter 858 of the 1972 Acts of Assembly as they were in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this act shall be given effect beginning
90 days after the nonappealable court order is issued.”

Prior to the 2006 amendment by Acts 2006, c. 780, the definition of “Place of primary use” read as follows: “

‘Place of primary use’
has the meaning attributed in subsection M of §

58.1-3812

.”

Acts 2010, cc. 466 and 566, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2011.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 68 K, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 7, Chapter 15, Title 56, Code of Virginia, $8,000,000 the first year and
$8,000,000 the second year from the Wireless E-911 Fund is included in this appropriation for local law enforcement dispatchers to offset dispatch center operations and related costs.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 425 A 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 7, Chapter 15, Title 56, Code of Virginia, $3,700,000 the first year
and $3,700,000 the second year from the Wireless E-911 Fund is included in this appropriation for telecommunications to offset dispatch center operations and related costs incurred for answering wireless 911 telephone calls.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 529 substituted “telecommunications” for “telephone” in the paragraphs defining “Automatic location identification” and “Automatic number identification,” deleted “service” following “to provide CMRS” in the paragraph defining
“CMRS provider,” substituted “or PSAP” for “(PSAP)” in the paragraph defining “Public Safety answering point,” and substituted “billed monthly on a per wireless telephone line basis by each CMRS provider and CMRS reseller to its Virginia
customers” for “assessed upon each CMRS telephone number assigned by a CMRS provider” in the paragraph defining “Wireless E-911 surcharge.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 68 rewrote the definition of “CMRS”; added the definition of “Place of primary use”; and rewrote the definition for “Wireless E-911 surcharge.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 160 substituted “subsection M” for “subsection L” in the definition of ‘place of primary use;’ substituted “24-hour” for “twenty-four hour” in the definition of ‘public safety answering point;’ and substituted “$.75” for “seventy-five
cents” in the definition of ‘wireless E-911 surcharge.’

The 2003 amendment by c. 341 in the definition of ‘Public safety answering point’, substituted “24-” for “twenty-four”, and in the definition of “Wireless E-911 surcharge”, substituted “$.75 billed” for “seventy-five cents billed monthly.”

The 2003 amendments by cc. 981 and 1021 are identical, and added the definition of ‘Chief Information Officer;’ deleted the definition of ‘director,’ which formerly read: “means the Director of the Department of Technology Planning;” substituted “24”
for “twenty-four” in the definition of ‘public safety answering point;’ and substituted “$.75” for “seventy-five cents” in the definition of ‘wireless E-911 surcharge.’

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 942, in the definition of “Wireless E-911 surcharge,” added the proviso at the end and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 739 added the definition of “VolP service”; and deleted the definition of “Wireless E-911 PSAP costs,” which formerly read: “‘Wireless E-911 PSAP costs’ means all reasonable direct recurring and nonrecurring capital costs and
operating expenses incurred by a PSAP in designing, upgrading, leasing, purchasing, programming, installing, testing, administering, delivering, or maintaining all necessary data, hardware, software and local exchange telephone service
required to provide wireless E-911 service and direct personnel costs incurred in receiving and dispatching wireless E-911 emergency telephone calls, which have been sworn to by an authorized agent of the PSAP.”

The 2006 amendment by c. 780, effective January 1, 2007, substituted “as defined in the federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. § 124, as amended” for “attributed in subsection M of §

58.1-3812

” in the paragraph defining “Place of primary use.” See Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 466 and 566, effective January 1, 2011, are identical, and inserted the definition of “postpaid CMRS”; in the definition of “Wireless E-911 Fund,” substituted “all prepaid wireless E-911 charges collected pursuant to § 56-484.17:1,
and any additional funds otherwise allocated or donated to the Wireless E-911 Fund” for “as well as any additional funds otherwise allocated or donated to the wireless E-911 fund” and made a stylistic change; and in the definition
of “wireless E-911 surcharge,” inserted “with respect to postpaid CMRS” and deleted “provided, however, that any fee collected or paid pursuant to the third paragraph of subsection B of § 56-484.17 is not required to be billed” at
the end.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 120 in the definition for “Wireless E-911 surcharge,” inserted “customers” and substituted “CMRS device capable of two-way interactive voice communication” for “CMRS number of a customer with a place of primary use in Virginia.”

The 2011 amendment by c. 138 deleted “Wireless” preceding “E-911 Services Board” in the definition for “Board.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 361, in the definition of “Board,” substituted “9-1-1 Services Board” for “E-911 Services Board”; added definitions of “Emergency services IP network,” “Next generation 9-1-1 service” and “9-1-1 service”; in definition of “CMRS
provider,” deleted “of Virginia” following “within the Commonwealth”; in definition of “Public safety answering point,” substituted “9-1-1 calls” for “E-911 calls” twice.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 532 and 533 are identical, and deleted the definitions for “FCC order,” “Wireless E-911 CMRS costs,” and “Wireless E-911 service”; and inserted the definitions for “ESInet point of interconnection” and “Originating service provider.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 423 substituted “§ 44-146.18:5” for “§

2.2-2031

” in the definition for “Division.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 248, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “9-8-8 call, call to the crisis call center, as defined in §

37.2-311.1

, or call to the NSPL, as defined in §

37.2-311.1

” in the definition for “Originating service provider”; rewrote the definition for “Wireless E-911 Fund”; and substituted “fee” for “monthly fee of $0.75” in the definition for “Wireless E-911 surcharge.”

Law Review.

For an article, “Technology and the Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1383 (1998).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-1624 Motion for Disclosure of 911 Calls.

§§ 56-484.12:1,
§§ 56-484.12:1,
56-484.12 2.
Repealed by Acts 2018, cc. 532 and 533, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 56-484.12:1, pertaining to notice to subscribers to Voice-over-Internet protocol service of lack of access to E-911, derived from Acts 2006, c. 691.

Former § 56-484.12:2, which required Voice-over-Internet protocol service providers to plan for access to E-911, derived from Acts 2006, c. 691.

§ 56-484.13.
9-1-1 Services Board; membership; terms; compensation.

The E-911 Services Board, formerly the Wireless E-911 Services Board, is hereby continued as the 9-1-1 Services Board. The Board shall exercise the powers and duties conferred in this article.

The 9-1-1 Services Board shall:

Support and assist PSAPs in the provision of 9-1-1 operations and services, including through provision of funding and development of best practices;

Plan, promote, and assist in the statewide development, deployment, and maintenance of an emergency services IP network that will support future 9-1-1 and other public safety applications and technologies; and

Consult and coordinate with PSAPs, state and local public bodies in the Commonwealth, public bodies in other states, CMRS providers, VoIP service providers affiliated with cable companies, and other entities as needed in the exercise of the Board’s powers
and duties.

The Board shall consist of 16 members as follows: the Director of the Virginia Department of Emergency Management, who shall serve as chairman of the Board; the Comptroller, who shall serve as the treasurer of the Board; the Chief Information Officer;
and the following 13 members to be appointed by the Governor: one member representing the Virginia State Police; one member representing a local exchange carrier providing E-911 service in Virginia; one member representing VoIP
service providers affiliated with cable companies and authorized to transact business in Virginia; two members representing wireless service providers authorized to do business in Virginia; three county, city, or town PSAP directors
or managers representing diverse regions of Virginia; one Virginia sheriff; one chief of police; one fire chief; one emergency medical services manager; and one finance officer of a county, city, or town.

The Commonwealth Interoperability Coordinator shall serve as an advisor to the Board in the exercise of the powers and duties conferred in this article so as to ensure, among other matters, that enhanced wireless emergency telecommunications services
and technologies are compliant with the statewide interoperability strategic plan.

All members appointed by the Governor shall serve five-year terms. The CIO and the Comptroller shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. No gubernatorial appointee shall serve more than two consecutive terms.

A majority of the Board shall constitute a quorum. The Board shall meet at least quarterly or at the call of its chairman.

Members of the Board shall serve without compensation; however, members of the Board shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in §§

2.2-2813

through

2.2-2826

.

The Division shall provide staff support to the Board. The Division of Public Safety Communications created in § 44-146.18:5 and the Virginia Department of Transportation shall provide such technical advice as the Board requires.

History.
2000, c. 1064; 2003, cc. 981, 1021; 2006, c. 739; 2009, c. 613; 2011, c. 138; 2012, c. 36; 2016, c. 361; 2020, c. 423.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 981 and 1021 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “14” for “fourteen,” and “Chief Information Officer” for “Director of the Department of Technology Planning;” substituted “CIO” for “Director of the Department of
Technology Planning” in subsection C; and inserted the first sentence in subsection F.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 739 rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 613, in subsection C, substituted “the Director of the Virginia Department of Emergency Management” for “the Chief Information Officer,” inserted “the Chief Information Officer” following “treasurer of the Board,” substituted
“12 members” for “13 members” and deleted “one member representing the Virginia Department of Emergency Management” following “by the Governor.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 138, in the introductory language in subsection A, substituted “is hereby continued as the E-911 Services Board” for “is hereby created”; and in subsection B, deleted “Wireless” preceding “E-911 Services Board.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 36 added subsection D and redesignated the following subsections accordingly.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 361 rewrote subsections A and B; in subsection C, substituted “16” for “15,” and “13” for “12” and inserted “one member representing VoIP service providers affiliated with cable companies and authorized to transact business in
Virginia.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 423 substituted “Division of Public Safety Communications created in § 44-146.18:5” for “Geographic Information Network Division created in § 2.2-2026” in subsection H.

§ 56-484.14.
Powers and duties of the 9-1-1 Services Board.

The 9-1-1 Services Board shall have the power and duty to:

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers, including purchase agreements payable from (i) the Wireless E-911 Fund and (ii) other moneys appropriated for the
provision of 9-1-1 services.

Pursue all legal remedies to enforce any provision of this article, or any contract entered into pursuant to this article.

Develop a comprehensive, statewide enhanced 9-1-1 plan for wireless E-911, VoIP E-911, and any other future communications technologies accessing 9-1-1 for emergency purposes. In constructing and periodically updating this plan as appropriate, the Board
shall monitor trends and advances in enhanced wireless, VoIP, and other emergency telecommunications technologies, plan and forecast future needs for these enhanced technologies, and formulate strategies for the efficient and effective
delivery of 9-1-1 services in the future.

Grant such extensions of time for compliance with the provisions of § 56-484.16 as the Board deems appropriate.

Take all steps necessary to inform the public of the use of the digits “9-1-1” as the designated emergency telephone number and the use of the digits “#-7-7” as a designated non-emergency telephone number.

Report annually to the Governor, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations and the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Virginia State Crime Commission on (i) the state of enhanced 9-1-1 services in the Commonwealth, (ii) the impact of,
or need for, legislation affecting enhanced 9-1-1 services in the Commonwealth, and (iii) the need for changes in the E-911 funding mechanism provided to the Board, as appropriate.

Provide advisory technical assistance to PSAPs and state and local law enforcement, and fire and emergency medical services agencies, upon request.

Collect, distribute, and withhold moneys from the Wireless E-911 Fund as provided in this article.

Develop a comprehensive single, statewide electronic addressing database to support geographic data and statewide base map data programs pursuant to subsection D of § 44-146.18:6.

Receive such funds as may be appropriated for purposes consistent with this article and such gifts, donations, grants, bequests, or other funds as may be received from, applied for or offered by either public or private sources.

Manage other moneys appropriated for the provision of enhanced emergency telecommunications services.

Perform all acts necessary, convenient, or desirable to carrying out the purposes of this article.

Drawing from the work of 9-1-1 professional organizations, in its sole discretion, publish best practices for PSAPs. These best practices shall be voluntary and recommended by a subcommittee composed of PSAP representatives.

Develop or adopt and publish standards for an emergency services IP network and core NG9-1-1 services on that network to ensure that enhanced public safety telephone services seamlessly interoperate within the Commonwealth and with surrounding states.

Monitor developments in 9-1-1 service and multiline telephone systems and the impact of such technologies upon the implementation of Article 8 (§ 56-484.19 et seq.). The Board shall include its assessment of such impact in the annual report filed pursuant
to subdivision 6.

History.
2000, c. 1064; 2005, c. 942; 2006, c. 739; 2007, c. 427; 2011, c. 138; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2016, c. 361; 2020, c. 423.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 942 inserted subdivisions 10 and 11, and redesignated former subdivisions 10 and 11 as present subdivisions 12 and 13.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 739 rewrote the section.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 427 added subdivision 14.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 138, in the introductory language, inserted “E-911 Services”; and in subdivision 14, deleted “of Chapter 15 of Title 56” following “(§ 56-484.19 et seq).”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “services” for “service” following “medical” in subdivision 7.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 361 substituted “9-1-1 Services Board” for “E-911 Services Board” in the introductory paragraph; in subdivision 1, deleted “enhanced” preceding “9-1-1”; in subdivision 3, substituted “9-1-1 for emergency purposes” for “E-911 for
emergency purposes” and deleted “enhanced” preceding “9-1-1 services” and “with the exclusion of traditional circuit-switched wireline 9-1-1 service” from the end of the subdivision; in subdivision 13, substituted “9-1-1” for “E-911”;
added subdivision 14 and renumbered former subdivision 14 as subdivision 15; and in subdivision 15, deleted “enhanced” preceding “9-1-1.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 423 substituted “subsection D of § 44-146.18:6” for “§ 2.2-2027” in subdivision 9.

§ 56-484.15.
Repealed by Acts 2018, cc. 532 and 533, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 56-484.15, which established the Wireless Carrier E-911 Cost Recovery Subcommittee, derived from Acts 2000, c. 1064; 2003, cc. 981, 1021; 2006, c. 739; 2009, c. 613.

§ 56-484.16.
Local emergency telecommunications requirements; text messages; use of digits “9-1-1.”

On or before July 1, 2003, every county, city or town in the Commonwealth shall be served by an E-911 system, unless an extension of time has been granted by the Board.

On or before July 1, 2020, each PSAP in the Commonwealth shall deploy equipment, products, and services necessary or appropriate to enable the PSAP to receive and process calls for emergency assistance sent via Short Message Service (SMS) text messages
in a manner consistent with FCC Order 14-118 and any other FCC order that affects the deployment of SMS text-to-9-1-1. Upon such deployment, the PSAP shall notify the FCC’s PSAP Text-to-911 Readiness and Certification Registry.

The digits “9-1-1” shall be the designated emergency telephone number in Virginia. No public safety agency shall advertise or otherwise promote the use of any number for emergency response service other than “9-1-1.”

All originating service providers required to provide access to 9-1-1 service shall route the 9-1-1 calls of their subscribers to ESInet points of interconnection designated by the Board. The Board shall establish points of interconnection at or within
the local access and transport area and in proximity of each selective router central office providing E-911 service as of July 1, 2018. Additionally, the Board shall establish a minimum of one pair (two) and a maximum of three
pair (six) geographically diverse from their designated pair point of session initiation protocol (SIP) interconnection within the Commonwealth. The Board shall establish ESInet points of interconnection in a manner that minimizes
cost to the originating service providers to the extent practicable while still achieving necessary 9-1-1 service and ESInet objectives.

The NG9-1-1 service provider shall receive the 9-1-1 calls delivered by the originating service provider at the designated ESInet points of interconnection and deliver the calls to the appropriate PSAP. The NG9-1-1 service provider shall not charge the
originating service provider to connect to the ESInet point of interconnection nor for the delivery of the 9-1-1 calls to the PSAP. The originating service provider responsibility for 9-1-1 calls ends and the PSAP responsibility
begins at their respective sides of the ESInet point of interconnection.

The PSAP shall validate the location of the originating service provider subscribers as necessary to ensure the location exists and will route to the appropriate PSAP if 9-1-1 is dialed. The PSAP shall not charge the originating service provider for such
validation.

No later than July 1, 2023, the Board shall develop and fully implement NG9-1-1 transition plans to migrate PSAPs and originating service providers from E-911 to NG9-1-1. To the extent practicable, the migration of PSAPs will be implemented on a sequential
region-by-region basis for those PSAPs served by each legacy E-911 selective router pair. With a minimum of six months’ written notice to the impacted stakeholders, this date may be extended by the Board for good cause. For purposes
of this section, “good cause” means an event or events reasonably beyond the ability of the Board to anticipate or control.

History.
2000, c. 1064; 2001, c. 713; 2005, c. 942; 2018, cc. 532, 533, 673.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 713 inserted “Except as provided in subsection D” at the beginning of the first and second sentences of subsection A, and at the beginning of subsection B; and added subsection D.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 942 rewrote the section.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 532 and 533 are identical, and added subsections D through G; and made a stylistic change.

The 2018 amendment by c. 673 inserted subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

§ 56-484.16:1.
PSAP dispatchers; training requirements.

As used in this section:“Dispatcher” means an individual employed by a public safety answering point, an emergency medical dispatch service provider, or both, who is qualified to answer incoming emergency telephone calls or provide for the appropriate
emergency response either directly or through communication with the appropriate PSAP.“Emergency Medical Dispatch” means a systematic program of handling medical calls pursuant to which trained dispatchers determine the nature
and priority of the call, dispatch the appropriate response, and give the caller instructions to help treat the caller until the arrival of the appropriate responder.“Emergency Medical Dispatch certification” means certification
by an Office of Emergency Medical Services recognized emergency dispatch training organization meeting or exceeding standards by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration and accepted and recognized by the American Society
for Testing Materials (ASTM).“Emergency Medical Dispatch education program” means an Emergency Medical Dispatch certification education program that meets national criteria set forth by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.“High-quality
telecommunicator cardiopulmonary resuscitation instruction” or “TCPR” means the delivery by trained 911 telecommunicators of high-quality cardiopulmonary resuscitation instruction for acute events requiring cardiopulmonary resuscitation,
including out-of-hospital cardiac arrests.“Office” means the Office of Emergency Medical Services within the Department of Health.

By July 1, 2021, the Office of Emergency Medical Services shall adopt standards for training and equipment required for the provision of TCPR by dispatchers. The standards shall meet or exceed nationally recognized emergency cardiovascular care guidelines.
At a minimum, training standards shall require dispatchers to obtain certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and shall incorporate recognition protocols for out-of-hospital cardiac arrest, compression-only cardiopulmonary
resuscitation instructions for callers, and continuing education as appropriate. The Office shall update such standards as frequently as necessary, but not more frequently than biennially, in order to keep the standards current
with nationally recognized emergency cardiovascular care guidelines.

On or before January 1, 2022, each PSAP shall provide training in TCPR to each dispatcher in its employ and shall provide its dispatchers with equipment necessary for the provision of TCPR. The training and equipment shall comply with the standards adopted
by the Office pursuant to subsection B. Following completion of the initial training, each dispatcher’s training shall be updated or supplemented in order to reflect updates to the training standards.

An operator of a PSAP may enter into a reciprocal agreement with the operator of another PSAP authorizing the initial PSAP to transfer callers to the other PSAP at times that the PSAP does not have a trained dispatcher on duty who is able to provide TCPR
to a caller. If a PSAP transfers a caller under the provisions of this subsection, the transferring PSAP shall use an evidence-based protocol for the identification of a person in need of cardiopulmonary resuscitation and ensure
that the PSAP to which calls are transferred uses dispatchers who meet the training requirements under subsection B to provide assistance on administering TCPR.

The Office of Emergency Medical Services shall identify all public agencies and other persons that provide TCPR training that satisfies the requirements adopted under subsection B and set minimum standards for course approval, instruction, and examination,
including online training modules based on nationally recognized guidelines. The Office shall implement a means to ensure that every dispatcher who has satisfactorily completed a training program and his employing PSAP receive
a certificate of completion of the required TCPR training.

No dispatcher who instructs a caller on TCPR shall be liable for any civil damages arising out of the instruction provided to the caller, except for acts or omissions intentionally designed to harm or for grossly negligent acts or omissions that result
in harm to an individual. A caller may decline to receive TCPR. When a caller declines TCPR, the dispatcher has no obligation to provide such instruction.

By January 1, 2024, each operator of a PSAP shall implement a requirement that each of its dispatchers shall by July 1, 2024, have completed an Emergency Medical Dispatch education program that complies with minimum standards established by the Office
of Emergency Medical Services. The Office shall ensure that every dispatcher who has satisfactorily completed an Emergency Medical Dispatch education program and his employing PSAP receive a certificate of completion of the required
education program. Following completion of the initial Emergency Medical Dispatch education program, each dispatcher’s training shall be updated or supplemented in order to reflect updates to the education program.

Each PSAP shall conduct ongoing quality assurance of its TCPR program.

The State Board of Health shall adopt regulations in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) as are necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

History.
2020, cc. 1068, 1069.